Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Board of Public Accountancy

§ 51.
Creation of Board.

The Board of Public Accountancy is created, consisting of five members, who shall be residents of this State.

At least one member of the Board shall be a member of the public who has no pecuniary interest in accounting other than as a consumer or possible consumer of its services. The member shall have no pecuniary interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister.

At least three members of the Board shall be licensed certified public accountants.

Board members shall be appointed for five-year terms by the Governor in accordance with

3 V.S.A. § 129b

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 89

, § 1;

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 8.

§ 52.
Functioning of Board.

Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair and a secretary.

Meetings may be called by the Chair and shall be called upon the request of any other two members.

Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A. chapter 5.

A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.

All business may be transacted by a majority vote of the members present and voting, unless otherwise provided by statute.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 89

, § 2;

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 53.
Repealed. 1981, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 54.
General powers and duties of the Board.

The Board shall adopt rules concerning:

a definition of the practice of public accountancy, interpreting section 13 of this title as appropriate;

qualifications for obtaining licensure, interpreting the relevant statutes as appropriate;

forms approved by the Secretary of State, which are to be used by the Board; and

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given to applicants and the public.

The Board may:

conduct examinations and pass upon the qualifications of applicants for licensing;

adopt rules of professional conduct for establishing and maintaining high standards of competence and integrity in the profession of public accounting;

adopt rules establishing reasonable continuing education requirements, not to exceed 40 hours per year, and establish or approve continuing education programs to assist a licensee in meeting these requirements;

investigate suspected violations of section 14 of this title and suspected unprofessional conduct;

conduct hearings;

issue subpoenas and administer oaths in connection with any authorized investigation or hearing;

take or cause depositions to be taken as needed in any investigation or hearing before it;

receive legal assistance from the Secretary of State’s office and from the Attorney General;

seek and obtain injunctions to restrain violations of section 14 of this title or unprofessional conduct;

cooperate with licensing and regulatory authorities in other jurisdictions to investigate suspected violations of section 14 of this title and suspected unprofessional conduct; and

adopt rules regarding peer reviews that may be required to be performed under this chapter.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 89

, § 4;

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; eff. June 13, 2002;

2007, No. 29

, § 9;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 55.
Repealed. 1981, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 56.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application for license $ 100.00 (2) Biennial renewal of license $ 220.00 (3) Firm registration $ 200.00 (4) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>[Repealed.] (5) Firm biennial renewal of registration $ 400.00 (6) Sole proprietor firm biennial renewal of registration $ 200.00

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 89

, § 6;

1981, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1991, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1997, No. 59

, § 47, eff. June 30, 1997;

1999, No. 49

, § 169;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 19; eff. June 21, 2002;

2009, No. 35

, § 7;

2011, No. 33

, § 2;

2019, No. 70

, § 14;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§§ 57-62.
Repealed.
1975, No. 89, § 15.